Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1425
Commission; solicit advice.

The commission shall provide ongoing means for information suppliers and users to advise the commission in carrying out sections 85-1421 to 85-1427.

Laws 1978, LB 897, § 8;

Laws 1985, LB 421, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 110;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 85-975;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 29.